src/srseng/resources/fst/srs2eng.lexc
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  m a k e %  t h e m %  w o r k ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  m a k e %  t h e m %  w o r k ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  m a k e %  t h e m %  w o r k ] : [ "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  m a r k i n g %/ w r i t i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  m a r k i n g %/ w r i t i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  m a r k i n g %/ w r i t i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  m a r k i n g %/ w r i t e %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  m a r k i n g %/ w r i t i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  m a r k i n g %/ w r i t i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  m a r k i n g %/ w r i t i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  s t a r t e d %  t o %  w r i t e %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī d ì s t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  s t a r t e d %  t o %  w r i t e %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī d ì s t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  s t a r t e d %  t o %  w r i t e %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī d ì s t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  s t a r t e d %  t o %  w r i t e %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī d ì s t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  s t a r t e d %  t o %  w r i t e %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī d ì s t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  s t a r t e d %  t o %  w r i t e %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī d ì s t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  s t a r t e d %  t o %  w r i t e %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ ī d ī d ì s t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w r o t e %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w r o t e %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w r o t e %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w r o t e %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w r o t e %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w r o t e %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w r o t e %  i t ] : [ y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  I %  d i d %  n o t %  w r i t e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e ] : [ d ú d à y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ì s à "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  y o u %  d i d %  n o t %  w r i t e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e ] : [ d ú d à y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ì s à "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e %/ s h e %  d i d %  n o t %  w r i t e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e ] : [ d ú d à y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ì s à "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  w e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e %  d i d %  n o t %  w r i t e %  i t ] : [ d ú d à y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ì s à "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+Neg" "+Distr" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  y o u %  a l l %  d i d %  n o t %  w r i t e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e ] : [ d ú d à y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ì s à "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  t h e y %  d i d %  n o t %  w r i t e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e ] : [ d ú d à y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ì s à "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  s o m e o n e %  d i d %  n o t %  w r i t e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e ] : [ d ú d à y ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ì s à "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+Neg" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w r o t e %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w r o t e %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w r o t e %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w r o t e %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w r o t e %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w r o t e %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w r o t e %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī d ī y ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w r i t e %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w r i t e %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w r i t e s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w r i t e %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w r i t e %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w r i t e %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w r i t e s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á y ī d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ à n à d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ à n à d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  g e t s %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ à n à d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ à n à d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ à n à d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ à n à d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  g e t s %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] : [ à n à d ī t ɫ ' ì s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
